Washington statutes.
RCW 43.250.050

Investment pool—Employment of personnel.

The state treasurer's office is authorized to employ such personnel as are necessary to administer the public funds investment account. The bond of the state treasurer as required by law shall be made to include the faithful performance of all functions relating to the investment pool.

[ 1986 c 294 s 5.]